Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-156
Money or personal property to credit of inmate or patient; delivery to owner or heirs not prohibited.

Nothing contained in sections 83-153 to 83-156 shall be construed in such a manner as to prohibit the Department of Health and Human Services, the Department of Correctional Services, or the Department of Veterans' Affairs from voluntarily remitting or delivering to any present or former inmate or patient of any state institution, subject to the jurisdiction of such department, or to his or her heirs, legatees, or other persons lawfully entitled to the same, any money or other personal property in the hands of the department to the credit of such inmate or patient, either during the confinement of such inmate or patient, or at any time thereafter.

Laws 1953, c. 352, § 4, p. 1128;

Laws 1973, LB 563, § 37;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 919;

Laws 2018, LB827, § 7.